Illinois, session 104th, HB3693.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-74.4-3.5 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-3.5)7    Sec. 11-74.4-3.5. Completion dates for redevelopment 8projects.9    (a) Unless otherwise stated in this Section, the estimated 10dates of completion of the redevelopment project and 11retirement of obligations issued to finance redevelopment 12project costs (including refunding bonds under Section 1311-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the year in 14which the payment to the municipal treasurer, as provided in 15subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act, is to be made 16with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 23rd calendar 17year after the year in which the ordinance approving the 18redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance was 19adopted on or after January 15, 1981 and before July 1, 2025.20    (a-2) Unless otherwise provided in this Section, the 21estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment project and 22retirement of obligations issued to finance redevelopment 23project costs (including refunding bonds under Section   HB3693- 2 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b111-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the year in 2which the payment to the municipal treasurer, as provided in 3subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act, is to be made 4with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 15th calendar 5year after the year in which the ordinance approving the 6redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance was 7adopted on or after July 1, 2025. 8    (a-5) If the redevelopment project area is located within 9a transit facility improvement area established pursuant to 10Section 11-74.4-3, the estimated dates of completion of the 11redevelopment project and retirement of obligations issued to 12finance redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds 13under Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of 14the year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer, as 15provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act, 16is to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 1735th calendar year after the year in which the ordinance 18approving the redevelopment project area was adopted. 19    (a-7) A municipality may adopt tax increment financing for 20a redevelopment project area located in a transit facility 21improvement area that also includes real property located 22within an existing redevelopment project area established 23prior to August 12, 2016 (the effective date of Public Act 2499-792). In such case: (i) the provisions of this Division 25shall apply with respect to the previously established 26redevelopment project area until the municipality adopts, as   HB3693- 3 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1required in accordance with applicable provisions of this 2Division, an ordinance dissolving the special tax allocation 3fund for such redevelopment project area and terminating the 4designation of such redevelopment project area as a 5redevelopment project area; and (ii) after the effective date 6of the ordinance described in (i), the provisions of this 7Division shall apply with respect to the subsequently 8established redevelopment project area located in a transit 9facility improvement area. 10    (b) The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 11project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 12redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 13Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 14year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 15provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 16to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 32nd 17calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 18the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 19was adopted on September 9, 1999 by the Village of Downs. 20    The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 21project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 22redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 23Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 24year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 25provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 26to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 33rd   HB3693- 4 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 2the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 3was adopted on May 20, 1985 by the Village of Wheeling.4    The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 5project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 6redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 7Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 8year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 9provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 10to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 28th 11calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 12the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 13was adopted on October 12, 1989 by the City of Lawrenceville. 14    (b-5) The estimated dates of completion of the 15redevelopment project and retirement of obligations issued to 16finance redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds 17under Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of 18the year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 19provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 20to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 32nd 21calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 22the redevelopment project area was adopted if the ordinance 23was adopted on April 19, 2004 by the Village of Tremont. 24    (c) The estimated dates of completion of the redevelopment 25project and retirement of obligations issued to finance 26redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under   HB3693- 5 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1Section 11-74.4-7) may not be later than December 31 of the 2year in which the payment to the municipal treasurer as 3provided in subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-8 of this Act is 4to be made with respect to ad valorem taxes levied in the 35th 5calendar year after the year in which the ordinance approving 6the redevelopment project area was adopted:7        (1) If the ordinance was adopted before January 15, 8    1981.9        (2) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1983, 10    April 1984, July 1985, or December 1989.11        (3) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1987 and 12    the redevelopment project is located within one mile of 13    Midway Airport.14        (4) If the ordinance was adopted before January 1, 15    1987 by a municipality in Mason County.16        (5) If the municipality is subject to the Local 17    Government Financial Planning and Supervision Act or the 18    Financially Distressed City Law.19        (6) If the ordinance was adopted in December 1984 by 20    the Village of Rosemont.21        (7) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 22    by a municipality located in Clinton County for which at 23    least $250,000 of tax increment bonds were authorized on 24    June 17, 1997, or if the ordinance was adopted on December 25    31, 1986 by a municipality with a population in 1990 of 26    less than 3,600 that is located in a county with a   HB3693- 6 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    population in 1990 of less than 34,000 and for which at 2    least $250,000 of tax increment bonds were authorized on 3    June 17, 1997.4        (8) If the ordinance was adopted on October 5, 1982 by 5    the City of Kankakee, or if the ordinance was adopted on 6    December 29, 1986 by East St. Louis.7        (9) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 1991 8    by the Village of Sauget.9        (10) If the ordinance was adopted on February 11, 1985 10    by the City of Rock Island.11        (11) If the ordinance was adopted before December 18, 12    1986 by the City of Moline.13        (12) If the ordinance was adopted in September 1988 by 14    Sauk Village.15        (13) If the ordinance was adopted in October 1993 by 16    Sauk Village.17        (14) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 18    by the City of Galva.19        (15) If the ordinance was adopted in March 1991 by the 20    City of Centreville.21        (16) If the ordinance was adopted on January 23, 1991 22    by the City of East St. Louis.23        (17) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 24    by the City of Aledo.25        (18) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1990 26    by the City of Clinton.  HB3693- 7 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1        (19) If the ordinance was adopted on September 6, 1994 2    by the City of Freeport.3        (20) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 4    by the City of Tuscola.5        (21) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 6    by the City of Sparta.7        (22) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 8    by the City of Beardstown.9        (23) If the ordinance was adopted on April 27, 1981, 10    October 21, 1985, or December 30, 1986 by the City of 11    Belleville.12        (24) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 13    by the City of Collinsville.14        (25) If the ordinance was adopted on September 14, 15    1994 by the City of Alton.16        (26) If the ordinance was adopted on November 11, 1996 17    by the City of Lexington.18        (27) If the ordinance was adopted on November 5, 1984 19    by the City of LeRoy.20        (28) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1991 or 21    June 3, 1992 by the City of Markham.22        (29) If the ordinance was adopted on November 11, 1986 23    by the City of Pekin.24        (30) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1981 25    by the City of Champaign.26        (31) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1986   HB3693- 8 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    by the City of Urbana.2        (32) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 1986 3    by the Village of Heyworth.4        (33) If the ordinance was adopted on February 24, 1992 5    by the Village of Heyworth.6        (34) If the ordinance was adopted on March 16, 1995 by 7    the Village of Heyworth.8        (35) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986 9    by the Town of Cicero.10        (36) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 11    by the City of Effingham.12        (37) If the ordinance was adopted on May 9, 1991 by the 13    Village of Tilton.14        (38) If the ordinance was adopted on October 20, 1986 15    by the City of Elmhurst.16        (39) If the ordinance was adopted on January 19, 1988 17    by the City of Waukegan.18        (40) If the ordinance was adopted on September 21, 19    1998 by the City of Waukegan.20        (41) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 21    by the City of Sullivan.22        (42) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1991 23    by the City of Sullivan.24        (43) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 25    by the City of Oglesby.26        (44) If the ordinance was adopted on July 28, 1987 by   HB3693- 9 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    the City of Marion.2        (45) If the ordinance was adopted on April 23, 1990 by 3    the City of Marion.4        (46) If the ordinance was adopted on August 20, 1985 5    by the Village of Mount Prospect.6        (47) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1998 7    by the Village of Woodhull.8        (48) If the ordinance was adopted on April 20, 1993 by 9    the Village of Princeville.10        (49) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 1986 by 11    the City of Granite City.12        (50) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1989 13    by the Village of Lombard.14        (51) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 15    by the Village of Gardner.16        (52) If the ordinance was adopted on July 14, 1999 by 17    the Village of Paw Paw.18        (53) If the ordinance was adopted on November 17, 1986 19    by the Village of Franklin Park.20        (54) If the ordinance was adopted on November 20, 1989 21    by the Village of South Holland.22        (55) If the ordinance was adopted on July 14, 1992 by 23    the Village of Riverdale.24        (56) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 25    by the City of Galesburg.26        (57) If the ordinance was adopted on April 1, 1985 by   HB3693- 10 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    the City of Galesburg.2        (58) If the ordinance was adopted on May 21, 1990 by 3    the City of West Chicago.4        (59) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 5    by the City of Oak Forest.6        (60) If the ordinance was adopted in 1999 by the City 7    of Villa Grove.8        (61) If the ordinance was adopted on January 13, 1987 9    by the Village of Mt. Zion.10        (62) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 11    by the Village of Manteno.12        (63) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1989 by 13    the City of Chicago Heights.14        (64) If the ordinance was adopted on January 6, 1999 15    by the Village of Rosemont.16        (65) If the ordinance was adopted on December 19, 2000 17    by the Village of Stone Park.18        (66) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 19    by the City of DeKalb.20        (67) If the ordinance was adopted on December 2, 1986 21    by the City of Aurora. 22        (68) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 23    by the Village of Milan.24        (69) If the ordinance was adopted on September 8, 1994 25    by the City of West Frankfort.26        (70) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 1986   HB3693- 11 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    by the Village of Libertyville.2        (71) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 3    by the Village of Hoffman Estates. 4        (72) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 5    1986 by the Village of Sherman. 6        (73) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 7    by the City of Macomb.8        (74) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 9    the City of East Peoria to create the West Washington 10    Street TIF.11        (75) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 12    the City of East Peoria to create the Camp Street TIF. 13        (76) If the ordinance was adopted on August 7, 2000 by 14    the City of Des Plaines.15        (77) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 1986 16    by the City of Washington to create the Washington Square 17    TIF #2.18        (78) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 19    by the City of Morris. 20        (79) If the ordinance was adopted on July 6, 1998 by 21    the Village of Steeleville.22        (80) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 23    by the City of Pontiac to create TIF I (the Main St TIF).24        (81) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 1986 25    by the City of Pontiac to create TIF II (the Interstate 26    TIF).   HB3693- 12 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1        (82) If the ordinance was adopted on November 6, 2002 2    by the City of Chicago to create the Madden/Wells TIF 3    District. 4        (83) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 1998 5    by the City of Chicago to create the Roosevelt/Racine TIF 6    District. 7        (84) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 8    the City of Chicago to create the Stony Island 9    Commercial/Burnside Industrial Corridors TIF District. 10        (85) If the ordinance was adopted on November 29, 1989 11    by the City of Chicago to create the Englewood Mall TIF 12    District.13        (86) If the ordinance was adopted on December 27, 1986 14    by the City of Mendota. 15        (87) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 1986 16    by the Village of Cahokia.17        (88) If the ordinance was adopted on September 20, 18    1999 by the City of Belleville.19        (89) If the ordinance was adopted on December 30, 1986 20    by the Village of Bellevue to create the Bellevue TIF 21    District 1.22        (90) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 1993 23    by the Village of Crete.24        (91) If the ordinance was adopted on February 12, 2001 25    by the Village of Crete.26        (92) If the ordinance was adopted on April 23, 2001 by   HB3693- 13 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    the Village of Crete.2        (93) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 1986 3    by the City of Champaign. 4        (94) If the ordinance was adopted on December 20, 1986 5    by the City of Charleston. 6        (95) If the ordinance was adopted on June 6, 1989 by 7    the Village of Romeoville. 8        (96) If the ordinance was adopted on October 14, 1993 9    and amended on August 2, 2010 by the City of Venice. 10        (97) If the ordinance was adopted on June 1, 1994 by 11    the City of Markham. 12        (98) If the ordinance was adopted on May 19, 1998 by 13    the Village of Bensenville. 14        (99) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 1987 15    by the City of Dixon. 16        (100) If the ordinance was adopted on December 20, 17    1988 by the Village of Lansing. 18        (101) If the ordinance was adopted on October 27, 1998 19    by the City of Moline. 20        (102) If the ordinance was adopted on May 21, 1991 by 21    the Village of Glenwood. 22        (103) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1992 23    by the City of East Peoria. 24        (104) If the ordinance was adopted on December 14, 25    1998 by the City of Carlyle.26        (105) If the ordinance was adopted on May 17, 2000, as   HB3693- 14 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    subsequently amended, by the City of Chicago to create the 2    Midwest Redevelopment TIF District. 3        (106) If the ordinance was adopted on September 13, 4    1989 by the City of Chicago to create the Michigan/Cermak 5    Area TIF District. 6        (107) If the ordinance was adopted on March 30, 1992 7    by the Village of Ohio. 8        (108) If the ordinance was adopted on July 6, 1998 by 9    the Village of Orangeville.10        (109) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 11    1997 by the Village of Germantown. 12        (110) If the ordinance was adopted on April 28, 2003 13    by Gibson City. 14        (111) If the ordinance was adopted on December 18, 15    1990 by the Village of Washington Park, but only after the 16    Village of Washington Park becomes compliant with the 17    reporting requirements under subsection (d) of Section 18    11-74.4-5, and after the State Comptroller's certification 19    of such compliance. 20        (112) If the ordinance was adopted on February 28, 21    2000 by the City of Harvey.22        (113) If the ordinance was adopted on January 11, 1991 23    by the City of Chicago to create the Read/Dunning TIF 24    District. 25        (114) If the ordinance was adopted on July 24, 1991 by 26    the City of Chicago to create the Sanitary and Ship Canal   HB3693- 15 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    TIF District. 2        (115) If the ordinance was adopted on December 4, 2007 3    by the City of Naperville. 4        (116) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 2002 by 5    the Village of Arlington Heights. 6        (117) If the ordinance was adopted on February 11, 7    1991 by the Village of Machesney Park. 8        (118) If the ordinance was adopted on December 29, 9    1993 by the City of Ottawa. 10        (119) If the ordinance was adopted on June 4, 1991 by 11    the Village of Lansing. 12        (120) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 13    2004 by the Village of Fox Lake.14        (121) If the ordinance was adopted on December 22, 15    1992 by the City of Fairfield.16        (122) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 17    1992 by the City of Mt. Sterling. 18        (123) If the ordinance was adopted on March 15, 2004 19    by the City of Batavia. 20        (124) If the ordinance was adopted on March 18, 2002 21    by the Village of Lake Zurich.22        (125) If the ordinance was adopted on September 23, 23    1997 by the City of Granite City. 24        (126) If the ordinance was adopted on May 8, 2013 by 25    the Village of Rosemont to create the Higgins Road/River 26    Road TIF District No. 6.   HB3693- 16 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1        (127) If the ordinance was adopted on November 22, 2    1993 by the City of Arcola. 3        (128) If the ordinance was adopted on September 7, 4    2004 by the City of Arcola. 5        (129) If the ordinance was adopted on November 29, 6    1999 by the City of Paris. 7        (130) If the ordinance was adopted on September 20, 8    1994 by the City of Ottawa to create the U.S. Route 6 East 9    Ottawa TIF. 10        (131) If the ordinance was adopted on May 2, 2002 by 11    the Village of Crestwood. 12        (132) If the ordinance was adopted on October 27, 1992 13    by the City of Blue Island. 14        (133) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 15    1993 by the City of Lacon. 16        (134) If the ordinance was adopted on May 4, 1998 by 17    the Village of Bradford. 18        (135) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 19    the City of Oak Forest. 20        (136) If the ordinance was adopted on November 16, 21    1992 by the City of Pinckneyville. 22        (137) If the ordinance was adopted on March 1, 2001 by 23    the Village of South Jacksonville. 24        (138) If the ordinance was adopted on February 26, 25    1992 by the City of Chicago to create the Stockyards 26    Southeast Quadrant TIF District.  HB3693- 17 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1        (139) If the ordinance was adopted on January 25, 1993 2    by the City of LaSalle.3        (140) If the ordinance was adopted on December 23, 4    1997 by the Village of Dieterich. 5        (141) If the ordinance was adopted on February 10, 6    2016 by the Village of Rosemont to create the 7    Balmoral/Pearl TIF No. 8 Tax Increment Financing 8    Redevelopment Project Area. 9        (142) If the ordinance was adopted on June 11, 2002 by 10    the City of Oak Forest.11        (143) If the ordinance was adopted on January 31, 1995 12    by the Village of Milledgeville. 13        (144) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1996 14    by the Village of Pearl City. 15        (145) If the ordinance was adopted on December 21, 16    1994 by the City of Calumet City.17        (146) If the ordinance was adopted on May 5, 2003 by 18    the Town of Normal. 19        (147) If the ordinance was adopted on June 2, 1998 by 20    the City of Litchfield. 21        (148) If the ordinance was adopted on October 23, 1995 22    by the City of Marion. 23        (149) If the ordinance was adopted on May 24, 2001 by 24    the Village of Hanover Park. 25        (150) If the ordinance was adopted on May 30, 1995 by 26    the Village of Dalzell.   HB3693- 18 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1        (151) If the ordinance was adopted on April 15, 1997 2    by the City of Edwardsville. 3        (152) If the ordinance was adopted on September 5, 4    1995 by the City of Granite City. 5        (153) If the ordinance was adopted on June 21, 1999 by 6    the Village of Table Grove. 7        (154) If the ordinance was adopted on February 23, 8    1995 by the City of Springfield. 9        (155) If the ordinance was adopted on August 11, 1999 10    by the City of Monmouth. 11        (156) If the ordinance was adopted on December 26, 12    1995 by the Village of Posen. 13        (157) If the ordinance was adopted on July 1, 1995 by 14    the Village of Caseyville. 15        (158) If the ordinance was adopted on January 30, 1996 16    by the City of Madison. 17        (159) If the ordinance was adopted on February 2, 1996 18    by the Village of Hartford. 19        (160) If the ordinance was adopted on July 2, 1996 by 20    the Village of Manlius. 21        (161) If the ordinance was adopted on March 21, 2000 22    by the City of Hoopeston.23        (162) If the ordinance was adopted on March 22, 2005 24    by the City of Hoopeston.25        (163) If the ordinance was adopted on July 10, 1996 by 26    the City of Chicago to create the Goose Island TIF   HB3693- 19 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    District.2        (164) If the ordinance was adopted on December 11, 3    1996 by the City of Chicago to create the Bryn 4    Mawr/Broadway TIF District.5        (165) If the ordinance was adopted on December 31, 6    1995 by the City of Chicago to create the 95th/Western TIF 7    District.8        (166) If the ordinance was adopted on October 7, 1998 9    by the City of Chicago to create the 71st and Stony Island 10    TIF District.11        (167) If the ordinance was adopted on April 19, 1995 12    by the Village of North Utica.13        (168) If the ordinance was adopted on April 22, 1996 14    by the City of LaSalle.15        (169) If the ordinance was adopted on June 9, 2008 by 16    the City of Country Club Hills. 17        (170) If the ordinance was adopted on July 3, 1996 by 18    the Village of Phoenix.19        (171) If the ordinance was adopted on May 19, 1997 by 20    the Village of Swansea.21        (172) If the ordinance was adopted on August 13, 2001 22    by the Village of Saunemin.23        (173) If the ordinance was adopted on January 10, 2005 24    by the Village of Romeoville. 25        (174) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1997 26    by the City of Berwyn for the South Berwyn Corridor Tax   HB3693- 20 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    Increment Financing District.2        (175) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 1997 3    by the City of Berwyn for the Roosevelt Road Tax Increment 4    Financing District.5        (176) If the ordinance was adopted on May 3, 2001 by 6    the Village of Hanover Park for the Village Center Tax 7    Increment Financing Redevelopment Project Area (TIF # 3).8        (177) If the ordinance was adopted on January 1, 1996 9    by the City of Savanna. 10        (178) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 2002 11    by the Village of Okawville.12        (179) If the ordinance was adopted on October 4, 1999 13    by the City of Vandalia.14        (180) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 2003 by 15    the City of Rushville.16        (181) If the ordinance was adopted on December 7, 1998 17    by the City of Quincy for the Central Business District 18    West Tax Increment Redevelopment Project Area. 19        (182) If the ordinance was adopted on March 27, 1997 20    by the Village of Maywood approving the Roosevelt Road TIF 21    District. 22        (183) If the ordinance was adopted on March 27, 1997 23    by the Village of Maywood approving the Madison 24    Street/Fifth Avenue TIF District. 25        (184) If the ordinance was adopted on November 10, 26    1997 by the Village of Park Forest.   HB3693- 21 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1        (185) If the ordinance was adopted on July 30, 1997 by 2    the City of Chicago to create the Near North TIF district. 3        (186) If the ordinance was adopted on December 1, 2000 4    by the Village of Mahomet. 5        (187) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 1999 by 6    the Village of Washburn. 7        (188) If the ordinance was adopted on August 19, 1998 8    by the Village of New Berlin. 9        (189) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 2002 10    by the City of Highwood. 11        (190) If the ordinance was adopted on June 1, 1997 by 12    the City of Flora. 13        (191) If the ordinance was adopted on August 17, 1999 14    by the City of Ottawa. 15        (192) If the ordinance was adopted on June 13, 2005 by 16    the City of Mount Carroll. 17        (193) If the ordinance was adopted on March 25, 2008 18    by the Village of Elizabeth. 19        (194) If the ordinance was adopted on February 22, 20    2000 by the City of Mount Pulaski. 21        (195) If the ordinance was adopted on November 21, 22    2000 by the City of Effingham.23        (196) If the ordinance was adopted on January 28, 2003 24    by the City of Effingham. 25        (197) If the ordinance was adopted on February 4, 2008 26    by the City of Polo.   HB3693- 22 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1        (198) If the ordinance was adopted on August 17, 2005 2    by the Village of Bellwood to create the Park Place TIF.3        (199) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 4    the Village of Bellwood to create the North-2014 TIF.5        (200) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 6    the Village of Bellwood to create the South-2014 TIF.7        (201) If the ordinance was adopted on July 16, 2014 by 8    the Village of Bellwood to create the Central Metro-2014 9    TIF.10        (202) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 11    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 12    Creek "A" (Southwest)-2014 TIF.13        (203) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 14    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 15    Creek "B" (Northwest)-2014 TIF.16        (204) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 17    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 18    Creek "C" (Northeast)-2014 TIF.19        (205) If the ordinance was adopted on September 17, 20    2014 by the Village of Bellwood to create the Addison 21    Creek "D" (Southeast)-2014 TIF.22        (206) If the ordinance was adopted on June 26, 2007 by 23    the City of Peoria.24        (207) If the ordinance was adopted on October 28, 2008 25    by the City of Peoria. 26        (208) If the ordinance was adopted on April 4, 2000 by   HB3693- 23 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    the City of Joliet to create the Joliet City Center TIF 2    District. 3        (209) If the ordinance was adopted on July 8, 1998 by 4    the City of Chicago to create the 43rd/Cottage Grove TIF 5    district. 6        (210) If the ordinance was adopted on July 8, 1998 by 7    the City of Chicago to create the 79th Street Corridor TIF 8    district. 9        (211) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 1998 10    by the City of Chicago to create the Bronzeville TIF 11    district. 12        (212) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 13    by the City of Chicago to create the Homan/Arthington TIF 14    district. 15        (213) If the ordinance was adopted on December 8, 1998 16    by the Village of Plainfield. 17        (214) If the ordinance was adopted on July 17, 2000 by 18    the Village of Homer.19        (215) If the ordinance was adopted on December 27, 20    2006 by the City of Greenville.21        (216) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 22    the City of Chicago to create the Kinzie Industrial TIF 23    district.24        (217) If the ordinance was adopted on December 2, 1998 25    by the City of Chicago to create the Northwest Industrial 26    TIF district.  HB3693- 24 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1        (218) If the ordinance was adopted on June 10, 1998 by 2    the City of Chicago to create the Pilsen Industrial TIF 3    district.4        (219) If the ordinance was adopted on January 14, 1997 5    by the City of Chicago to create the 35th/Halsted TIF 6    district.7        (220) If the ordinance was adopted on June 9, 1999 by 8    the City of Chicago to create the Pulaski Corridor TIF 9    district. 10        (221) If the ordinance was adopted on December 16, 11    1997 by the City of Springfield to create the Enos Park 12    Neighborhood TIF District. 13        (222) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 14    by the City of Chicago to create the Roosevelt/Cicero 15    redevelopment project area. 16        (223) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 1998 17    by the City of Chicago to create the Western/Ogden 18    redevelopment project area. 19        (224) If the ordinance was adopted on July 21, 1999 by 20    the City of Chicago to create the 24th/Michigan Avenue 21    redevelopment project area. 22        (225) If the ordinance was adopted on January 20, 1999 23    by the City of Chicago to create the Woodlawn 24    redevelopment project area. 25        (226) If the ordinance was adopted on July 7, 1999 by 26    the City of Chicago to create the Clark/Montrose   HB3693- 25 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    redevelopment project area. 2        (227) If the ordinance was adopted on November 4, 2003 3    by the City of Madison to create the Rivers Edge 4    redevelopment project area. 5        (228) If the ordinance was adopted on August 12, 2003 6    by the City of Madison to create the Caine Street 7    redevelopment project area. 8        (229) If the ordinance was adopted on March 7, 2000 by 9    the City of Madison to create the East Madison TIF. 10        (230) If the ordinance was adopted on August 3, 2001 11    by the Village of Aviston. 12        (231) If the ordinance was adopted on August 22, 2011 13    by the Village of Warren. 14        (232) If the ordinance was adopted on April 8, 1999 by 15    the City of Farmer City.16        (233) If the ordinance was adopted on August 4, 1999 17    by the Village of Fairmont City.18        (234) If the ordinance was adopted on October 2, 1999 19    by the Village of Fairmont City. 20        (235) If the ordinance was adopted December 16, 1999 21    by the City of Springfield. 22        (236) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 23    1999 by the Village of Palatine to create the Village of 24    Palatine Downtown Area TIF District.25        (237) If the ordinance was adopted on September 29, 26    1999 by the City of Chicago to create the 111th/Kedzie   HB3693- 26 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    redevelopment project area.2        (238) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 3    1998 by the City of Chicago to create the Canal/Congress 4    redevelopment project area.5        (239) If the ordinance was adopted on July 7, 1999 by 6    the City of Chicago to create the Galewood/Armitage 7    Industrial redevelopment project area.8        (240) If the ordinance was adopted on September 29, 9    1999 by the City of Chicago to create the Madison/Austin 10    Corridor redevelopment project area.11        (241) If the ordinance was adopted on April 12, 2000 12    by the City of Chicago to create the South Chicago 13    redevelopment project area. 14        (242) If the ordinance was adopted on January 9, 2002 15    by the Village of Elkhart. 16        (243) If the ordinance was adopted on May 23, 2000 by 17    the City of Robinson to create the West Robinson 18    Industrial redevelopment project area. 19        (244) If the ordinance was adopted on October 9, 2001 20    by the City of Robinson to create the Downtown Robinson 21    redevelopment project area. 22        (245) If the ordinance was adopted on September 19, 23    2000 by the Village of Valmeyer. 24        (246) If the ordinance was adopted on April 15, 2002 25    by the City of McHenry to create the Downtown TIF 26    district.   HB3693- 27 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1        (247) If the ordinance was adopted on February 15, 2    1999 by the Village of Channahon. 3        (248) If the ordinance was adopted on December 19, 4    2000 by the City of Peoria. 5        (249) If the ordinance was adopted on July 24, 2000 by 6    the City of Rock Island to create the North 11th Street 7    redevelopment project area.8        (250) If the ordinance was adopted on February 5, 2002 9    by the City of Champaign to create the North Campustown 10    TIF. 11        (251) If the ordinance was adopted on November 20, 12    2000 by the Village of Evergreen Park. 13        (252) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 14    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the 15    Fullerton/Milwaukee redevelopment project area. 16        (253) If the ordinance was adopted on October 23, 2006 17    by the Village of Bourbonnais to create the Bourbonnais 18    Industrial Park Conservation Area.19        (254) If the ordinance was adopted on February 22, 20    2000 by the City of Geneva to create the East State Street 21    redevelopment project area.22        (255) If the ordinance was adopted on February 6, 2001 23    by the Village of Downers Grove to create the Ogden Avenue 24    redevelopment project area.25        (256) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 26    the City of Chicago to create the Division/Homan   HB3693- 28 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    redevelopment project area.2        (257) If the ordinance was adopted on May 17, 2000 by 3    the City of Chicago to create the 63rd/Pulaski 4    redevelopment project area.5        (258) If the ordinance was adopted on March 10, 1999 6    by the City of Chicago to create the Greater Southwest 7    Industrial (East) redevelopment project area.8        (259) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 9    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Lawrence/Kedzie 10    redevelopment project area.11        (260) If the ordinance was adopted on November 3, 1999 12    by the City of Chicago to create the Lincoln Avenue 13    redevelopment project area.14        (261) If the ordinance was adopted on September 3, 15    2015 by the Village of Fox River Grove to create the 16    Downtown TIF #2 redevelopment project area. 17        (262) If the ordinance was adopted on October 16, 2000 18    by the Village of Franklin Park to create the Downtown 19    Franklin Avenue redevelopment project area.20        (263) If the ordinance was adopted on September 8, 21    2003 by the City of Jacksonville to create the Downtown 22    Redevelopment Project Area.23        (264) If the ordinance was adopted on August 13, 2002 24    by the City of Prophetstown to create the Redevelopment 25    Project Area No. 1.26        (265) If the ordinance was adopted on August 29, 2006   HB3693- 29 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    by the City of Ottawa to create the Ottawa Dayton 2    Industrial TIF District.3        (266) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2006 by 4    the City of Ottawa to create the Ottawa Canal TIF 5    District.6        (267) If the ordinance was adopted on March 5, 2001 by 7    the City of Salem to create the TIF No 2 - Redevelopment 8    Area.9        (268) If the ordinance was adopted on January 23, 2002 10    by the Village of Malta to create the Harkness Property 11    redevelopment project area.12        (269) If the ordinance was adopted on June 16, 2008 by 13    the City of Highland to create TIF #1.14        (270) If the ordinance was adopted on January 3, 2012 15    by the City of Highland to create TIF #2.16        (271) If the ordinance was adopted on January 1, 2000 17    by the City of Chicago to create the Belmont/Central 18    redevelopment project area.19        (272) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 20    the City of Chicago to create the Englewood Neighborhood 21    redevelopment project area.22        (273) If the ordinance was adopted on December 13, 23    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Lake Calumet Area 24    Industrial redevelopment project area.25        (274) If the ordinance was adopted on October 15, 2001 26    by the City of Des Plaines to create TIF No. 6 Mannheim   HB3693- 30 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    Higgins Road. 2        (275) If the ordinance was adopted on October 22, 2001 3    by the City of Sullivan to create TIF District III. 4        (276) If the ordinance was adopted on November 12, 5    2013 by the City of Oak Forest to create the City of Oak 6    Forest Cicero Avenue Tax Increment Financing District 7    Redevelopment Project Area TIF District #6. 8        (277) If the ordinance was adopted on December 15, 9    2003 by the City of Knoxville.10        (278) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 11    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Peterson/Pulaski 12    redevelopment project area.13        (279) If the ordinance was adopted on February 16, 14    2000 by the City of Chicago to create the Central West 15    redevelopment project area.16        (280) If the ordinance was adopted on June 27, 2001 by 17    the City of Chicago to create the Lawrence/Broadway 18    redevelopment project area.19        (281) If the ordinance was adopted on March 18, 2002 20    by the City of St. Charles for the First Street District 21    #4.22        (282) If the ordinance was adopted on April 6, 2001 by 23    the Village of Melrose Park to create the Seniors First 24    TIF.25        (283) If the ordinance was adopted on April 6, 2001 by 26    the Village of Melrose Park to create the Zenith Opus TIF.   HB3693- 31 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    (d) For redevelopment project areas for which bonds were 2issued before July 29, 1991, or for which contracts were 3entered into before June 1, 1988, in connection with a 4redevelopment project in the area within the State Sales Tax 5Boundary, the estimated dates of completion of the 6redevelopment project and retirement of obligations to finance 7redevelopment project costs (including refunding bonds under 8Section 11-74.4-7) may be extended by municipal ordinance to 9December 31, 2013. The termination procedures of subsection 10(b) of Section 11-74.4-8 are not required for these 11redevelopment project areas in 2009 but are required in 2013. 12The extension allowed by Public Act 87-1272 shall not apply to 13real property tax increment allocation financing under Section 1411-74.4-8.15    (e) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 16increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 17only, shall be not more than 35 years for redevelopment 18project areas that were adopted on or after December 16, 1986 19and for which at least $8 million worth of municipal bonds were 20authorized on or after December 19, 1989 but before January 1, 211990; provided that the municipality elects to extend the life 22of the redevelopment project area to 35 years by the adoption 23of an ordinance after at least 14 but not more than 30 days' 24written notice to the taxing bodies, that would otherwise 25constitute the joint review board for the redevelopment 26project area, before the adoption of the ordinance.  HB3693- 32 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    (f) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 2increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 3only, shall be not more than 35 years for redevelopment 4project areas that were established on or after December 1, 51981 but before January 1, 1982 and for which at least 6$1,500,000 worth of tax increment revenue bonds were 7authorized on or after September 30, 1990 but before July 1, 81991; provided that the municipality elects to extend the life 9of the redevelopment project area to 35 years by the adoption 10of an ordinance after at least 14 but not more than 30 days' 11written notice to the taxing bodies, that would otherwise 12constitute the joint review board for the redevelopment 13project area, before the adoption of the ordinance.14    (f-1) (Blank). 15    (f-2) (Blank). 16    (f-3) (Blank). 17    (f-5) Those dates, for purposes of real property tax 18increment allocation financing pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8 19only, shall be not more than 47 years for redevelopment 20project areas listed in this subsection; provided that (i) the 21municipality adopts an ordinance extending the life of the 22redevelopment project area to 47 years and (ii) the 23municipality provides notice to the taxing bodies that would 24otherwise constitute the joint review board for the 25redevelopment project area not more than 30 and not less than 2614 days prior to the adoption of that ordinance:   HB3693- 33 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1        (1) If the redevelopment project area was established 2    on December 29, 1981 by the City of Springfield. 3        (2) If the redevelopment project area was established 4    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Morris and that is 5    known as the Morris TIF District 1. 6        (3) If the redevelopment project area was established 7    on December 31, 1986 by the Village of Cahokia. 8        (4) If the redevelopment project area was established 9    on December 20, 1986 by the City of Charleston. 10        (5) If the redevelopment project area was established 11    on December 23, 1986 by the City of Beardstown. 12        (6) If the redevelopment project area was established 13    on December 23, 1986 by the Town of Cicero. 14        (7) If the redevelopment project area was established 15    on December 29, 1986 by the City of East St. Louis. 16        (8) If the redevelopment project area was established 17    on January 23, 1991 by the City of East St. Louis. 18        (9) If the redevelopment project area was established 19    on December 29, 1986 by the Village of Gardner. 20        (10) If the redevelopment project area was established 21    on June 11, 2002 by the City of East Peoria to create the 22    West Washington Street TIF. 23        (11) If the redevelopment project area was established 24    on December 22, 1986 by the City of Washington creating 25    the Washington Square TIF #2.26        (12) If the redevelopment project area was established   HB3693- 34 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    on November 11, 1986 by the City of Pekin.2        (13) If the redevelopment project area was established 3    on December 30, 1986 by the City of Belleville. 4        (14) If the ordinance was adopted on April 3, 1989 by 5    the City of Chicago Heights. 6        (15) If the redevelopment project area was established 7    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Pontiac to create TIF I 8    (the Main St TIF). 9        (16) If the redevelopment project area was established 10    on December 29, 1986 by the City of Pontiac to create TIF 11    II (the Interstate TIF). 12        (17) If the redevelopment project area was established 13    on December 23, 1986 by the City of Sparta to create TIF 14    #1. Any termination procedures provided for in Section 15    11-74.4-8 are not required for this redevelopment project 16    area prior to the 47th calendar year after the year in 17    which the ordinance approving the redevelopment project 18    year was adopted. 19        (18) If the redevelopment project area was established 20    on March 30, 1992 by the Village of Ohio to create the 21    Village of Ohio TIF District.22        (19) If the redevelopment project area was established 23    on December 13, 1993 by the Village of Crete.24        (20) If the redevelopment project area was established 25    on February 12, 2001 by the Village of Crete.26        (21) If the redevelopment project area was established   HB3693- 35 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1    on April 23, 2001 by the Village of Crete.2        (22) If the redevelopment project area was established 3    on December 29, 1993 by the City of Ottawa to create the 4    Ottawa I-80 North TIF District.5        (23) If the redevelopment project area was established 6    on September 20, 1994 by the City of Ottawa to create the 7    Ottawa Rt. 6 East TIF District.8        (24) If the redevelopment project area was established 9    on January 6, 1999 by the Village of Rosemont to create the 10    Village of Rosemont TIF 4 South River Road.11        (25) If the redevelopment project area was established 12    on December 20, 1988 by the Village of Lansing.13        (26) If the redevelopment project area was established 14    on November 20, 1989 by the Village of South Holland.15        (27) If the redevelopment project area was established 16    on December 11, 1989 by the Village of Melrose Park to 17    create the Mid-Metros TIF. 18    (g) In consolidating the material relating to completion 19dates from Sections 11-74.4-3 and 11-74.4-7 into this Section, 20it is not the intent of the General Assembly to make any 21substantive change in the law, except for the extension of the 22completion dates for the City of Aurora, the Village of Milan, 23the City of West Frankfort, the Village of Libertyville, and 24the Village of Hoffman Estates set forth under items (67), 25(68), (69), (70), and (71) of subsection (c) of this Section. 26(Source: P.A. 102-117, eff. 7-23-21; 102-424, eff. 8-20-21;   HB3693- 36 -LRB104 11400 HLH 21488 b1102-425, eff. 8-20-21; 102-446, eff. 8-20-21; 102-473, eff. 28-20-21; 102-627, eff. 8-27-21; 102-675, eff. 11-30-21; 3102-745, eff. 5-6-22; 102-818, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1113, eff. 412-21-22; 103-315, eff. 7-28-23; 103-575, eff. 12-8-23; 5103-1016, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1058, eff. 12-31-24.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.